Utah statutes.
67-19e-102.   Definitions -- Application of chapter -- Exceptions.

(1)  In addition to the definitions found in Section 67-19-3, the following definitions apply to this chapter.

(a)  "Administrative law judge" means an individual who is employed or contracted by a state agency that:

(i)  presides over or conducts formal administrative hearings on behalf of an agency;

(ii)  has the power to administer oaths, rule on the admissibility of evidence, take testimony, evaluate evidence, and make determinations of fact; and

(iii)  issues written orders, rulings, or final decisions on behalf of an agency.

(b)  "Administrative law judge" does not mean:

(i)  an individual who reviews an order or ruling of an administrative law judge; or

(ii)  the executive director of a state agency.

(c)  "Committee" means the Administrative Law Judge Conduct Committee created in Section 67-19e-108.

(2)  This chapter applies to all agencies of the state except the:

(a)  Board of Pardons and Parole;

(b)  Department of Corrections; and

(c)  State Tax Commission.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

